Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska80-108
Veterans graves; petition for markers.

In all petitions to the county boards the petitioners shall state the names of veterans buried and the number of such graves in the townships, precincts or municipalities at the time of petitioning.

Laws 1909, c. 135, § 2, p. 484;

R.S.1913, § 7162;

C.S.1922, § 6808;

C.S.1929, § 80-111;

R.S.1943, § 80-108;

Laws 1969, c. 752, § 5, p. 2832.